en: Anti-caking agent: Cornstarch; None; Potato starch; Silicon dioxide; Tapioca starch; Tricalcium phosphate; Other
cs: Protispékavá látka: Kukuřičný škrob; Žádný; Bramborový škrob; Oxid křemičitý; Tapiokový škrob; Fosforečnan trivápenatý; Jiný
pl: Substancja przeciwzbrylająca: Skrobia kukurydziana; Brak; Skrobia ziemniaczana; Dwutlenek krzemu; Skrobia z tapioki; Fosforan triwapniowy; Inny
ru: Антислеживающий агент: Кукурузный крахмал; Нет; Картофельный крахмал; Диоксид кремния; Крахмал тапиоки; Трикальцийфосфат; Другое
bg-BG: Противослепващ агент: Царевично нишесте; Няма; Картофено нишесте; Силициев диоксид; Нишесте от тапиока; ТРИКАЛЦИЕВ ФОСФАТ; Друго
nl: Antiklontermiddel: Maïszetmeel; Geen; Aardappelzetmeel; Siliciumdioxide; Tapiocazetmeel; Tricalciumfosfaat; Overig
zh-TW: 抗結塊劑: 玉米澱粉; 無; 馬鈴薯澱粉; 二氧化矽; 木薯澱粉; 磷酸鈣; 其他
vi: Chất chống vón cục: Bột ngô; Không có; Bột khoai tây; Silicon dioxide; Tinh bột sắn; Tricalcium phosphate; Khác
es: Agente antiaglomerante: Fécula de maíz; Ninguno; Fécula de papa; Dióxido de silicio; Almidón de tapioca; Fosfato tricálcico; Otro
hr-HR: Tvar protiv zgrudnjavanja: Kukuruzni škrob; Nema; Krumpirov škrob; Silicijev dioksid; Škrob tapioke; Trikalcijev fosfat; Ostalo
ro-RO: Agent antiaglomerant: Amidon de porumb; Fără; Amidon de cartofi; Dioxid de siliciu; Amidon de tapioca; Fosfat tricalcic; Altele
fr: Agent anti-agglomérant: Fécule de maïs; Aucun; Fécule de pomme de terre; Dioxyde de silicium; Fécule de tapioca; Phosphate tricalcique; Autre
fi: Paakkuuntumisenestoaine: Maissitärkkelys; Ei mitään; Perunatärkkelys; Piidioksidi; Tapiokatärkkelys; Trikalsiumfosfaatti; Muu
tr: Topaklanmayı önleyici madde: Mısır nişastası; Yok; Patates nişastası; Silikon dioksit; Tapyoka nişastası; Trikalsiyum fosfat; Diğer
lt-LT: Lipnumą reguliuojanti medžiaga: Kukurūzų krakmolas; Nėra; Bulvių krakmolas; Silicio dioksidas; Tapijokos krakmolas; Trikalcio fosfatas; Kita
sv: Klumpförebyggande medel: Majsstärkelse; Inget; Potatisstärkelse; Kiseldioxid; Tapiokastärkelse; Trikalciumfosfat; Annat
it: Agente antiagglomerante: Amido di mais; Nessuno; Fecola di patate; Biossido di silicio; Amido di tapioca; Fosfato tricalcico; Altro
da: Antiklumpningsmiddel: Majsstivelse; Ingen; Kartoffelstivelse; Siliciumdioxid; Tapiokastivelse; Tricalciumfosfat; Andet
nb: Antiklumpemiddel: Maisstivelse; Ingen; Potetstivelse; Silisiumdioksid; Tapiokastivelse; Trikalsiumfosfat; Annet
ko: 고결방지제: 옥수수 전분; 없음; 감자 전분; 이산화규소; 타피오카 전분; 제삼인산칼슘; 기타
sl-SI: Sredstvo proti sprijemanju: Koruzni škrob; Brez; Krompirjev škrob; Silicijev dioksid; Tapiokin škrob; Trikalcijev fosfat; Drugo
hu: Csomósodásgátló szer: Kukoricakeményítő; Nincs; Burgonyakeményítő; Szilícium-dioxid; Tápiókakeményítő; Trikalcium-foszfát; Egyéb
th: สารป้องกันการจับตัวเป็นก้อน: แป้งข้าวโพด; ไม่มี; แป้งมันฝรั่ง; ซิลิกอนไดอกไซด์; แป้งมันสำปะหลัง; ไตรแคลเซียมฟอสเฟต; อื่นๆ
ja: 固結防止剤: コーンスターチ; なし; ポテトスターチ; 二酸化ケイ素; タピオカスターチ; リン酸三カルシウム; その他
pt-BR: Agente antiaglomerante: Amido de milho; Nenhum; Fécula de batata; Dióxido de silício; Goma de tapioca; Fosfato tricálcico; Outro
de: Trennmittel: Maisstärke; Keines; Kartoffelstärke; Siliciumdioxid; Tapiokastärke; Tricalciumphosphat; Sonstige
el: Αντισυσσωματικός παράγοντας: Άμυλο αραβοσίτου; Κανένα; Άμυλο πατάτας; Διοξείδιο του πυριτίου; Άμυλο ταπιόκας; Φωσφορικό ασβέστιο (Tricalcium phosphate); Άλλο
pt-PT: Agente antiaglomerante: Amido de milho; Nenhum; Fécula de batata; Dióxido de silício; Amido de tapioca; Fosfato tricálcico; Outro
zh-CN: 抗结块剂: 玉米淀粉; 无; 马铃薯淀粉; 二氧化硅; 木薯淀粉; 磷酸三钙; 其他
sk-SK: Protihrudkujúca látka: Kukuričný škrob; Žiadna; Zemiakový škrob; Oxid kremičitý; Tapiokový škrob; Fosforečnan trivápenatý; Iná